Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 3. Fraud and Liabilities.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Sec. 45.56.500.
General fraud.

A person may not, in connection with the offer, sale, or purchase of a security, directly or indirectly,

employ a device, scheme, or artifice to defraud;

make an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements made, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; or

engage in an act, practice, or course of business that operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit on another person.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 45.56.505; renumbered in 2018.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.510.
Prohibited conduct in providing investment advice.

A person that advises others for compensation, either directly or indirectly or through publications or writings, as to the value of securities or the advisability of investing in, purchasing, or selling securities or that, for compensation and as part of a regular business, issues or adopts analyses or reports relating to securities may not

employ a device, scheme, or artifice to defraud another person; or

engage in an act, practice, or course of business that operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit on another person.

A regulation adopted under this chapter may define an act, practice, or course of business of an investment adviser or an investment adviser representative, other than a supervised person of a federal covered investment adviser, as fraudulent, deceptive, or manipulative and may prescribe means reasonably designed to prevent investment advisers and investment adviser representatives, other than supervised persons of a federal covered investment adviser, from engaging in acts, practices, and courses of business defined as fraudulent, deceptive, or manipulative.

A regulation adopted under this chapter may specify the contents of an investment advisory contract entered into, extended, or renewed by an investment adviser.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.520.
Misleading filings.

A person may not, in a document filed with the administrator or in a proceeding under this chapter, make or cause to be made an untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made, in the light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.530.
Misrepresentations concerning registration or exemption.

The filing of an application for registration, a registration statement, a notice filing under this chapter, the registration of a person, the notice filing by a person, or the registration of a security under this chapter does not constitute a finding by the administrator that a record filed under this chapter is true, complete, and not misleading. The filing or registration or the availability of an exemption, exception, preemption, or exclusion for a security or a transaction does not mean that the administrator has passed on the merits or qualifications of, or recommended or given approval to, a person, security, or transaction. A person may not make, or cause to be made, to a purchaser, customer, client, or prospective customer or client a representation inconsistent with this section.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.540.
Evidentiary burden.

In a civil action or administrative proceeding under this chapter, a person claiming an exemption, exception, preemption, or exclusion has the burden to prove the applicability of the claim.

In a criminal proceeding under this chapter, an exemption, exception, preemption, or exclusion claimed by the defendant is an affirmative defense. In this subsection, “affirmative defense” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.550.
Filing of sales and advertising literature.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section, a regulation adopted or order issued under this chapter may require the filing of a prospectus, pamphlet, circular, form letter, advertisement, sales literature, or other advertising record relating to a security or investment advice, addressed or intended for distribution to prospective investors, including clients or prospective clients of a person registered or required to be registered as an investment adviser under this chapter.

This section does not apply to sales and advertising literature specified in (a) of this section that relates to a federal covered security, a federal covered investment adviser, or a security or transaction exempted by AS

45.56.110

,

45.56.120

,

45.56.130

, or

45.56.150

, except as required under AS

45.56.110

(7).

The administrator may by regulation or order prohibit the publication, circulation, or use of any advertising considered false or misleading.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2018, “AS

45.56.110

,

45.56.120

, 19

45.56.130

, or

45.56.150

” was substituted for “AS 45.56.205,

45.56.210

,

45.56.220

, or 45.56.240” and “AS

45.56.110

(7)” was substituted for “AS 45.56.205(7)” to reflect the renumbering of those sections.

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 45.56.560.
Qualified immunity.

A broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, federal covered investment adviser, or investment adviser representative is not liable to another broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, federal covered investment adviser, or investment adviser representative for defamation relating to a statement that is contained in a record required by the administrator, a designee of the administrator, the Securities and Exchange Commission, or a self-regulatory organization, unless the person knew, or should have known at the time the statement was made, that it was false in a material respect or the person acted in reckless disregard of the statement’s truth or falsity.

History.

(§ 25 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 36,
ch. 65, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.